en: Dried mint
fr: Menthe séchée
hr: Sušena metvica
lt: Džiovinta mėta
pl: Mięta suszona

en: Fresh mint
de: frische Minze
es: Menta fresca
fr: Menthe fraîche
hr: Svježa menta
lt: Šviežia mėta
nl: Verse munt
pl: Mięta świeża

en: Frozen mint
de: gefrorene Minze
es: Menta congelada
fr: Menthe surgelée
hr: Smrznuta menta
hu: Fagyasztott menta
lt: Šaldyta mėta
nl: Bevroren munt
pl: Mięta mrożona

en: Ground dried mint
de: gefriergetrockenete Minze
es: Menta seca molida
fr: Menthe sèche moulue
hr: Mljevena osušena metvica
lt: Džiovinta malta mėta
nl: Gemalen gedroogde munt

en: Potted mint
de: Minze im Topf
es: Macetas de menta, Menta en maceta
fr: Menthe en pot
hr: Metvica u saksiji
hu: Cserepes menta
lt: Mėta vazonėlyje
nl: Muntplanten in pot
pl: Mięta w doniczce

en: Pennyroyal
de: Polei, Frauenminze
es: Menta poleo, Poleo
fr: Menthe pouliot, Pouliot
hr: Buhača
la: Mentha pulegium
nl: Polei

en: Moringa
xx: Moringa
la: Moringa oleifera

en: Moringa leaves
fr: feuille de Moringa
nl: Moringa blad

en: Peppermint
ar: نعناع فلفلي
ba: бөтнөк үләне
ca: menta pebrera
cs: máta peprná
cy: mintys poeth
da: pebermynte
de: Pfefferminze
el: μέντα η πεπερώδης, ηδύοσμος ο πεπερώδης
eo: pipromento
es: Menta piperita
et: piparmünt
eu: mendafin
fa: نعنای فلفلی
fi: piparminttu
fr: Menthe poivrée
ga: lus an phiobair
gl: menta común
he: נענע חריפה
hi: पिपरमिंट
hr: paprene metvice, paprena metvica
hu: Borsmenta
hy: անանուխ
id: pepermin
is: piparminta
it: menta piperita
ja: ペパーミント
kk: бұрышты жалбыз
ko: 박하
la: Mentha x piperita
lt: Pipirmėtė
lv: piparmētra
ms: pudina
nb: peppermynte
nl: Pepermunt
pl: mięta pieprzowa
ps: تور ويلني
pt: hortelã-pimenta
ro: izmă bună
ru: мята перечная
sh: pitoma metvica
si: ڦودنو
sk: mäta pieporná
sl: poprova meta
sr: питома нана
sv: pepparmynta
ta: மிளகுக்கீரை
tg: наъно
th: เปปเปอร์มินต์
tr: bahçe nanesi
uk: м'ята перцева
vi: bạc hà
zh: 胡椒薄荷

en: Spearmint, Spear mint
af: kruisement
ar: نعناع مدبب
az: sünbüllü nanə
bg: джоджен
bn: পুদিনা
ca: menta verda
cs: máta klasnatá
cy: mintys ysbigog
da: grøn mynte
de: grüne Minze
el: δυόσμος
es: Hierbabuena, menta verde
et: rohemünt
eu: mendabeltz
fa: نعناع زینتی
fi: viherminttu
fr: Menthe verte, Menthe douce
ga: cartlainn gharraí
gl: hortelá verde
he: נענע קרחת
hr: Konjski bosiljak
hu: fodormenta
it: menta spicata, menta romana, menta gentile
ja: スペアミント
ko: 스피어민트
ku: nane
la: Mentha spicata
lt: Šaltmėtė
nl: Groene munt, Aarmunt
pl: mięta zielona
pt: Hortelã-verde
qu: ispiha muña
ru: мята колосистая
se: ruonáminta
sk: mäta klasnatá
sl: klasasta meta
sv: spearmint, grönmynta
te: పుదీనా
th: สเปียร์มินต์
uk: м'ята кучерява
zh: 留蘭香

en: Fresh spearmint
es: Hierbabuena fresca
fr: Menthe verte fraîche
hr: Svježa zelena metvica
nl: Verse groene munt

en: Frozen spearmint
es: Hierbabuena congelada
fr: Menthe verte surgelé
hr: Smrznuta zelena metvica
nl: Bevroren groene munt

en: Ground dried spearmint
es: Hierbabuena seca molida
fr: Menthe verte sèche moulue
hr: Mljevena osušena divlja metvica
nl: Gemalen gedroogde groene munt

en: Potted spearmint
es: Macetas de hierbabuena, Hierbabuena en maceta
fr: Menthe verte en pot
hr: Lončana metvica
nl: Groene muntplanten in pot
pt: Plantas de hortelã-verde

en: Oregano
bg: Риган
de: Oregano
es: Orégano
fi: Oregano
fr: Origan, Marjolaine sauvage, Marjolaine vivace, Origan commun
hr: Origano
it: Origano
ja: オレガノ
la: Origanum vulgare
lt: Raudonėlis
nl: Oregano, wilde marjolein, palingkruid
pl: Oregano, Lebiodka pospolita

en: Fresh oregano
es: Orégano fresco
fr: Origan frais
hr: Svježi origano
lt: Šviežias raudonėlis
nl: Verse oregano
pl: Oregano świeże

en: Dried oregano
fr: Origan séché
hr: Sušeni origano
lt: Džiovintas raudonėlis
pl: Oregano suszone

en: Ground dried oregano
de: Oregano gerebelt
es: Orégano seco molido
fr: Origan séché moulu, origan sec moulu
hr: Mljeveni sušeni origano
it: Origano essiccato
lt: Džiovintas maltas raudonėlis
nl: Gemalen gedroogde oregano

en: Potted oregano
es: Macetas de orégano, Orégano en maceta
fr: Origan en pot
hr: Origano u saksiji
lt: Raudonėlis vazonėlyje
nl: Oreganoplanten in pot

en: Parsley
bg: Магданоз
da: Persille
de: Petersilie
es: Perejil
fi: persilja
fr: Persil
hr: Peršin
it: Prezzemolo
ja: パセリ
la: Petroselinum crispum
lt: Petražolės
nl: Peterselie
pl: Pietruszka
sv: Persilja
tr: Maydanoz